Utah statutes.
26-8a-501.   Discrimination.

(1)  No person licensed, certified, or designated pursuant to this chapter may discriminate in the provision of emergency medical services on the basis of race, sex, color, creed, or prior inquiry as to ability to pay.

(2)  This chapter does not authorize or require medical assistance or transportation over the objection of an individual on religious grounds.



Enacted by Chapter 141, 1999 General Session

